Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Article 3. Recreational Mining Areas.

Sec. 41.23.600.
Purpose.

The purpose of AS

41.23.600

—

41.23.620

is to establish the area described in AS

41.23.620

as the Caribou Creek Recreational Mining Area.
The Caribou Creek Recreational Mining Area is established to provide for a public recreational mining area to permit public recreational activities and to allow other multiple use activities to continue as long as the activities do not detract from the primary purpose for the establishment of the Caribou Creek Recreational Mining Area.

History.

(§ 1 ch 67 SLA 1990)

Sec. 41.23.610.
Management and regulations.

The commissioner is responsible for the management of the surface and subsurface estate within the Caribou Creek Recreational Mining Area necessary to carry out the purposes of AS

41.23.600

. The commissioner shall adopt and may revise a management plan and shall adopt regulations for the management, use, and development of the Caribou Creek Recreational Mining Area.

The management plan, including any revisions, and regulations adopted by the commissioner shall be developed in consultation with the commissioner of fish and game and the commissioner of transportation and public facilities. The management plan and regulations shall address, but not be limited to,

the methods of mining permitted within the Caribou Creek Recreational Mining Area;

the types of mining equipment that may be used within the Caribou Creek Recreational Mining Area;

the protection of habitat within the Caribou Creek Recreational Mining Area; and

other restrictions consistent with the purposes stated in AS

41.23.600

.

Except as provided in this subsection, the Caribou Creek Recreational Mining Area is open to recreational mining under AS

41.23.600

—

41.23.620

. The commissioner of fish and game is responsible for the management of the fish and game resources and the public use of fish and wildlife resources within the Caribou Creek Recreational Mining Area consistent with the purposes stated in AS

41.23.600

. The commissioner of fish and game shall issue a general permit to the public authorizing recreational mining activities subject to seasonal restrictions on the mining activities within specified waterbody areas necessary to maintain fishery resources within the Caribou Creek Recreational Mining Area.

The Caribou Creek Recreational Mining Area is closed to mineral entry under AS

38.05.185

—

38.05.275

.

The commissioner shall permit the construction and realignment of the Glenn Highway by the commissioner of transportation and public facilities within the Caribou Creek Recreational Mining Area as follows:

Township 20 North, Range 10 East, Seward Meridian

the right-of-way lines that cross Caribou Creek Recreational Mining Area extend varying distances from the centerline as follows:

from Station 760+00 to Station 765+00 the right-of-way extends 300 feet on the left of centerline and 150 feet on the right;

from Station 765+00 to Station 780+00, the right-of-way extends 300 feet on each side of the centerline;

from Station 780+00 to P.T. Station 784+23.63 the right-of-way extends 300 feet on the left and 400 feet to the right of the centerline.

Section 29: The centerline of the realigned Glenn Highway is described as commencing at the Southwest corner of Section 29; thence on a state plane, Zone 4 bearing of North 2 degrees 09´55" West, along the West boundary of Section 29, 1481.55 feet to proposed centerline Station 692+58.19 and the True Point of Beginning; thence South 85 degrees 52´40" East, a distance of 3395.32 feet to proposed centerline Station 726+53.51; thence along a curve to the left, having a radius of 916.73 feet, through an arc of 121 degrees 37´14", a distance of 1945.93 feet to P.C.C. Station 745+99.44; thence along a compound curve to the left, having a radius of 1637.02 feet, through an arc of 30 degrees 01´50", a distance of 858.01 feet to Point of Tangent Station 754+57.45; thence North 57 degrees 31´44" West, a distance of 453.00 feet to P.C. Station 759+10.45; thence along a curve to the right, having a radius of 996.45 feet, through an arc of 144 degrees 30´28", a distance of 2513.18 feet to Point of Tangent Station 784+23.63 BACK = 741+49.55 AHEAD; thence North 86 degrees 58´44" East, a distance of 1347.13 feet to Station 754+96.68, a point on the east boundary of Section 29, said point is South 2 degrees 09´55" East, a distance of 115.88 feet from the Northeast corner of Section 29;

History.

(§ 1 ch 67 SLA 1990)

Sec. 41.23.620.
Caribou Creek Recreational Mining Area.

The vacant and unappropriated state-owned land and water and the state land and water acquired in the future that lie within 100 feet of either ordinary high water or mean high tide of the banks of the creeks or rivers described in this section are designated as the Caribou Creek Recreational Mining Area, are reserved from all uses incompatible with the purposes of AS

41.23.600

, and are assigned to the department for control and management:

Township 20 North, Range 10 East, Seward Meridian

That portion of Caribou Creek located in

That portion of the Matanuska River located in

Section 28:
W1/2

Section 29:
E1/2

Section 32:
SE1/4

Section 33:
NE1/4, NW1/4, SW1/4.

History.

(§ 1 ch 67 SLA 1990; am § 6 ch 9 SLA 1994)

Sec. 41.23.630.
Petersville Recreational Mining Area.

The purpose of this section is to establish the area described in (f) of this section as the Petersville Recreational Mining Area. The Petersville Recreational Mining Area is established to provide for a public recreational mining area to permit public recreational activities and to allow other multiple-use activities to continue as long as the activities do not detract from the primary purpose for the establishment of the Petersville Recreational Mining Area.

The commissioner is responsible for the management of the surface and subsurface estate within the Petersville Recreational Mining Area necessary to carry out the purposes of this section. The commissioner shall adopt and may revise a management plan and shall adopt regulations for the management, use, and development of the Petersville Recreational Mining Area. The management plan, including any revisions, and regulations adopted by the commissioner shall be developed in consultation with the commissioner of fish and game and the commissioner of transportation and public facilities. The management plan and regulations must address, but not be limited to,

the methods of mining permitted within the Petersville Recreational Mining Area;

the types of mining equipment that may be used within the Petersville Recreational Mining Area;

the protection of habitat within the Petersville Recreational Mining Area; and

other restrictions consistent with the purposes stated in this section.

Except as provided in this subsection, the Petersville Recreational Mining Area is open to recreational mining under this section. The commissioner of fish and game is responsible for the management of the fish and game resources and the public use of fish and wildlife resources within the Petersville Recreational Mining Area consistent with the purposes stated in this section. The commissioner of fish and game shall issue a general permit to the public authorizing recreational mining activities subject to seasonal restrictions on the mining activities within specified waterbody areas necessary to maintain fishery resources within the Petersville Recreational Mining Area.

The Petersville Recreational Mining Area is closed to mineral entry under AS

38.05.185

—

38.05.275

.

The commissioner shall permit the construction and realignment of the Petersville Road within the Petersville Recreational Mining Area as is determined necessary by the commissioner of transportation and public facilities.

The vacant and unappropriated state-owned land and water and the state land and water acquired in the future that lie within the following described mining claims described in United States Mineral Survey No. 2384 are reserved from all uses incompatible with the purposes of this section and are assigned to the department for control and management as the Petersville Recreational Mining Area:

Township 28 North, Range 8 West, Seward Meridian

Township 28 North, Range 9 West, Seward Meridian

Sections 6 — 8: Daisy No. 2; Hidden Treasure No. 1; Hidden Treasure No. 2; Flora No. 1; Flora No. 2; Moose No. 1; Beaver No. 1; Alexander No. 1; Alexander No. 2; Lost Shovel No. 1; Lost Shovel No. 2; Peters Creek No. 8; Peters Creek No. 9; Peters Creek No. 10; Peters Creek No. 11;

Section 1: Daisy No. 2; Hidden Treasure No. 1.

History.

(§ 18 ch 56 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 39 SLA 2014)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective September 16, 2014, in (f)(1), deleted “Sections 21 and 28: Alder No. 1; Alder No. 2; Cottonwood No. 3; Cottonwood No. 4; Seattle No. 1; Seattle No. 2; Contact No. 1; Contact Claim No. 2; Willow Claim; Korter Bench.” at the end.